Illinois, session 104th, SB2448.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Public 5University Direct Admission Program Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds all of the 7following:8        (1) Illinois has a strong system of public higher 9    education, including public universities and community 10    colleges across the State.11        (2) The Illinois economy thrives when Illinois 12    students choose to pursue postsecondary education at 13    Illinois institutions of higher education.14        (3) According to the National Bureau of Economic 15    Research, two-thirds of graduates stay and work in the 16    state in which they matriculated.17        (4) Students who have been historically underserved, 18    such as students who are the first in their families to go 19    to college, students who come from low-income families or 20    communities, students of color, and students from rural 21    communities, among others, often face the greatest 22    barriers to accessing higher education, in part because of 23    a lack of information.  SB2448- 2 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1        (5) Every eligible high school junior and senior in 2    Illinois should receive an offer to an Illinois 3    institution of higher education, including public 4    universities and community colleges.5        (6) Every eligible public community college student 6    seeking a transfer pathway should receive an offer to a 7    public university in Illinois.8        (7) Illinois can and should develop the tools and 9    technology to dramatically simplify the public university 10    and community college application and admission process 11    for Illinois students. 12    Section 10. Definition. In this Act, "public university" 13means the University of Illinois at Springfield, Southern 14Illinois University, Chicago State University, Eastern 15Illinois University, Governors State University, Illinois 16State University, Northeastern Illinois University, Northern 17Illinois University, Western Illinois University, or any other 18public university established or authorized by the General 19Assembly after the effective date of this Act. 20    Section 15. Direct admission program.21    (a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board 22of Higher Education, in collaboration with the Illinois 23Community College Board, the Illinois Student Assistance 24Commission, and the State Board of Education, shall establish   SB2448- 3 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1and administer a direct admission program. Consistent with the 2federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 and 3the School Code, the direct admission program shall 4automatically offer general admission into a public university 5or community college to qualified high school seniors in this 6State and to public community college students in this State 7who qualify to transfer to a public university.8    (b) Each public university in the direct admission program 9shall identify and provide its grade point average standards 10for general admission for first time admission and for 11transfer students to the Illinois Student Assistance 12Commission by March 1 of each year. The Illinois Student 13Assistance Commission in collaboration with the Board of 14Higher Education and the Illinois Community College Board 15shall determine which students meet the standards for general 16admission for each public university in the direct admission 17program, and that information shall be made available to the 18Board of Higher Education. The Board of Higher Education shall 19notify the student and to each public university. Each public 20university may also notify qualified students.21    (c) Beginning July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter, the 22Illinois Student Assistance Commission shall use data 23collected from school districts pursuant to Section 10-20.5a 24and paragraph 16 of Section 34-18 paragraph 16 of the School 25Code for purposes of subsection (b) to determine which 26students meet the standards for general admission and provide   SB2448- 4 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1the data to the Board of Higher Education.2    (d) As all public community colleges in this State are 3open-access institutions, student directory information shall 4be used to identify a student's local public community 5college, and the community college shall be included on all 6correspondence to a student indicating the student's 7acceptance to the community college alongside those public 8universities that offer the student direct admission, pursuant 9to subsection (b). The public community college may also 10notify students within their district directly. Under the 11direct admission program, a public community college shall 12offer admission to all students who are residents of the 13community college district. Under the direct admission 14program, a public university shall offer general admission to 15any high school senior in this State who meets the public 16university's standards for admission, as identified under 17subsection (b), and to any public community college transfer 18student transferring to a public university who meets all of 19the following requirements:20        (1) Is enrolled at a public community college in this 21    State.22        (2) Has earned a minimum of 30 graded, transferable 23    semester hours.24        (3) Meets the minimum grade point average requirement 25    as set by the public university as reported to Board of 26    Higher Education.  SB2448- 5 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    By July 1 of each year, community college districts shall 2provide on an equal basis and consistent with the federal 3Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, access to 4community college student directory information and each 5student's email address and grade point average to the 6Illinois Community College Board for the purpose of informing 7students of educational and career opportunities. Prior to 8transmitting the student's directory information, email 9address, and grade point average, each community college 10district will receive written consent of the student if they 11are 18 years of age or older or the student's parent of 12guardian if the student is younger than 18 years of age. 13Community college students are encouraged to consult the 14Illinois Articulation Initiative General Education Core 15Curriculum course list and other resources at the State and 16university level to determine course transferability for 17purposes of paragraph (2). Community college students who have 18not completed a degree prior to transfer shall be notified by 19the public university in which they are enrolled to consult 20the Student Transfer Achievement Reform Act to determine if 21they are eligible for reverse transfer of credits for the 22purpose of obtaining an associate degree.23    (e) In establishing the direct admission program, the 24Board of Higher Education, in collaboration with the Illinois 25Community College Board, shall specifically evaluate the 26impact on enrollment of low-income students, students of   SB2448- 6 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1color, first generation college students, students from 2populations underserved in higher education, and students from 3rural areas of this State.4    (f) The direct admission program may gather data and 5develop the technology to automatically notify high school 6seniors in this State and public community college transfer 7students of the direct admission program for the public 8universities for which those students qualify, based on the 9standards submitted under subsection (b) or, in the case of 10public community colleges, based on the community college 11district where those students reside.12    (g) The direct admission program may use the services of a 13statewide student application portal and aggregator to provide 14the automatic notification in subsection (f). The notification 15shall include the student's local public community college, 16consistent with the requirements in subsection (b).17    (h) The direct admission program shall provide admitted 18high school seniors in this State and public community college 19transfer students with the website address for the Illinois 20Student Assistance Commission to find information regarding 21State grant programs, support for financial aid application 22completion, scholarship searches, and other financial 23aid-related information and shall encourage students to 24determine their eligibility for financial aid based on the 25Free Application for Federal Student Aid or, if applicable, an 26application for State financial aid.  SB2448- 7 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    (i) A public university or community college may verify 2applicant information, including transcripts, Illinois 3residency, and high school graduation in determining 4eligibility for enrollment. A public university or community 5college may revoke admission if an applicant does not meet the 6public university's or community college's direct admission 7criteria as specified in this Act before enrolling at the 8public university or community college.9    The Board of Higher Education and the Illinois Community 10College Board shall adopt joint rules to develop procedures 11for the implementation of this Section. 12    Section 20. Preselection outreach campaign. Beginning with 13the 2027-2028 academic year, the Board of Higher Education, in 14collaboration with the Illinois Student Assistance Commission 15and the State Board of Education, shall develop, in 16consultation with the University of Illinois at Chicago and 17the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign, a preselection 18outreach campaign to encourage qualifying State high school 19juniors and seniors to apply to the University of Illinois at 20Chicago or the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. 21Preselection qualifying students shall be identified and 22encouraged to apply in the following manner:23        (1) The University of Illinois at Chicago and the 24    University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign shall determine 25    the criteria by which students shall be identified for the   SB2448- 8 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    preselection campaign, in consultation with the 2    universities' faculty and faculty senates. The University 3    of Illinois at Chicago and the University of Illinois at 4    Urbana-Champaign shall provide the preselection criteria 5    to the Board of Higher Education, as long as the 6    preselection criteria is based on data available to the 7    Board of Higher Education, by March 1 each year.8        (2) The University of Illinois at Chicago and the 9    University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign shall provide 10    the Board of Higher Education with the content of the 11    communication to be shared with students describing how to 12    request information on how to apply. The Board of Higher 13    Education shall use the same portal or mechanisms for this 14    communication as used for offers of direct admission under 15    Section 15.16        (3) The Board of Higher Education, in collaboration 17    with the Illinois Student Assistance Commission and the 18    State Board of Education, shall provide the University of 19    Illinois at Chicago and the University of Illinois at 20    Urbana-Champaign with the contact information of the 21    students who meet the eligibility criteria defined by the 22    University of Illinois at Chicago or the University of 23    Illinois at Urbana-Champaign.24        (4) The Board of Higher Education may adopt any rules 25    necessary to administer this Section.   SB2448- 9 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    Section 25. Direct admission program and preselection 2outreach campaign report.3    (a) The Board of Higher Education shall submit a report on 4the direct admission program and the preselection outreach 5campaign to the Governor and General Assembly by August 1, 62029 and each August 1 thereafter. The report shall include, 7but is not limited to, information related to implementation 8of the direct admission program, the demographic and 9geographic data of students offered direct admission and the 10public university or community college to which direct 11admission was offered, the demographic and geographic data of 12students who qualified for preselection to the University of 13Illinois at Chicago and the University of Illinois at 14Urbana-Champaign under Section 18, those who applied, and 15those who were offered admission, the demographic and 16geographic data of high school seniors and public community 17college transfer students who accepted direct admission and 18enrolled in the public university or public community college 19that offered that direct admission, changes in admissions and 20enrollment over time of high school seniors and public 21community college transfer students through the direct 22admission program, and recommendations to improve the direct 23admission program. The Board of Higher Education shall 24collaborate with the Illinois Community College Board, the 25State Board of Education, the Illinois Student Assistance 26Commission, and public universities to collect data necessary   SB2448- 10 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1to fulfill the reporting requirements of this Section.2    (b) The Board of Higher Education, in collaboration with 3the Illinois Community College Board, shall adopt any rules 4necessary to administer this Section. 5    Section 30. The School Code is amended by changing 6Sections 2-3.64a-5, 10-20.5a, and 34-18 as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.64a-5)8    Sec. 2-3.64a-5. State goals and assessment.9    (a) For the assessment and accountability purposes of this 10Section, "students" includes those students enrolled in a 11public or State-operated elementary school, secondary school, 12or cooperative or joint agreement with a governing body or 13board of control, a charter school operating in compliance 14with the Charter Schools Law, a school operated by a regional 15office of education under Section 13A-3 of this Code, or a 16public school administered by a local public agency or the 17Department of Human Services.18    (b) The State Board of Education shall establish the 19academic standards that are to be applicable to students who 20are subject to State assessments under this Section. The State 21Board of Education shall not establish any such standards in 22final form without first providing opportunities for public 23participation and local input in the development of the final 24academic standards. Those opportunities shall include a   SB2448- 11 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1well-publicized period of public comment and opportunities to 2file written comments.3    (c) Beginning no later than the 2014-2015 school year, the 4State Board of Education shall annually assess all students 5enrolled in grades 3 through 8 in English language arts and 6mathematics.7    Beginning no later than the 2017-2018 school year, the 8State Board of Education shall annually assess all students in 9science at one grade in grades 3 through 5, at one grade in 10grades 6 through 8, and at one grade in grades 9 through 12.11    The State Board of Education shall annually assess schools 12that operate a secondary education program, as defined in 13Section 22-22 of this Code, in English language arts and 14mathematics. The State Board of Education shall administer no 15more than 3 assessments, per student, of English language arts 16and mathematics for students in a secondary education program. 17One of these assessments shall be recognized by this State's 18public institutions of higher education, as defined in the 19Board of Higher Education Act, for the purpose of student 20application or admissions consideration. The assessment 21administered by the State Board of Education for the purpose 22of student application to or admissions consideration by 23institutions of higher education must be administered on a 24school day during regular student attendance hours, and 25student profile information collected by the assessment shall, 26if available, be made available to the State's public   SB2448- 12 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1institutions of higher education in a timely manner. 2    Students who do not take the State's final accountability 3assessment or its approved alternate assessment may not 4receive a regular high school diploma unless the student is 5exempted from taking the State assessments under subsection 6(d) of this Section because the student is enrolled in a 7program of adult and continuing education, as defined in the 8Adult Education Act, or the student is identified by the State 9Board of Education, through rules, as being exempt from the 10assessment.11    The State Board of Education shall not assess students 12under this Section in subjects not required by this Section.13    Districts shall inform their students of the timelines and 14procedures applicable to their participation in every yearly 15administration of the State assessments. The State Board of 16Education shall establish periods of time in each school year 17during which State assessments shall occur to meet the 18objectives of this Section.19    The requirements of this subsection do not apply if the 20State Board of Education has received a waiver from the 21administration of assessments from the U.S. Department of 22Education. 23    (d) Every individualized educational program as described 24in Article 14 shall identify if the State assessment or 25components thereof require accommodation for the student. The 26State Board of Education shall develop rules governing the   SB2448- 13 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1administration of an alternate assessment that may be 2available to students for whom participation in this State's 3regular assessments is not appropriate, even with 4accommodations as allowed under this Section.5    Students receiving special education services whose 6individualized educational programs identify them as eligible 7for the alternative State assessments nevertheless shall have 8the option of also taking this State's regular final 9accountability assessment, which shall be administered in 10accordance with the eligible accommodations appropriate for 11meeting these students' respective needs.12    All students determined to be English learners shall 13participate in the State assessments. The scores of those 14students who have been enrolled in schools in the United 15States for less than 12 months may not be used for the purposes 16of accountability. Any student determined to be an English 17learner shall receive appropriate assessment accommodations, 18including language supports, which shall be established by 19rule. Approved assessment accommodations must be provided 20until the student's English language skills develop to the 21extent that the student is no longer considered to be an 22English learner, as demonstrated through a State-identified 23English language proficiency assessment.24    (e) The results or scores of each assessment taken under 25this Section shall be made available to the parents of each 26student.  SB2448- 14 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    In each school year, the scores attained by a student on 2the final accountability assessment must be placed in the 3student's permanent record pursuant to rules that the State 4Board of Education shall adopt for that purpose in accordance 5with Section 3 of the Illinois School Student Records Act. In 6each school year, the scores attained by a student on the State 7assessments administered in grades 3 through 8 must be placed 8in the student's temporary record.9    (f) All schools shall administer the State's academic 10assessment of English language proficiency to all children 11determined to be English learners.12    (g) All schools in this State that are part of the sample 13drawn by the National Center for Education Statistics, in 14collaboration with their school districts and the State Board 15of Education, shall administer the academic assessments under 16the National Assessment of Educational Progress carried out 17under Section 411(b)(2) of the federal National Education 18Statistics Act of 1994 (20 U.S.C. 9010) if the U.S. Secretary 19of Education pays the costs of administering the assessments.20    (h) (Blank).21    (i) For the purposes of this subsection (i), "academically 22based assessments" means assessments consisting of questions 23and answers that are measurable and quantifiable to measure 24the knowledge, skills, and ability of students in the subject 25matters covered by the assessments. All assessments 26administered pursuant to this Section must be academically   SB2448- 15 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1based assessments. The scoring of academically based 2assessments shall be reliable, valid, and fair and shall meet 3the guidelines for assessment development and use prescribed 4by the American Psychological Association, the National 5Council on Measurement in Education, and the American 6Educational Research Association.7    The State Board of Education shall review the use of all 8assessment item types in order to ensure that they are valid 9and reliable indicators of student performance aligned to the 10learning standards being assessed and that the development, 11administration, and scoring of these item types are 12justifiable in terms of cost.13    (j) The State Superintendent of Education shall appoint a 14committee of no more than 21 members, consisting of parents, 15teachers, school administrators, school board members, 16assessment experts, regional superintendents of schools, and 17citizens, to review the State assessments administered by the 18State Board of Education. The Committee shall select one of 19its members as its chairperson. The Committee shall meet on an 20ongoing basis to review the content and design of the 21assessments (including whether the requirements of subsection 22(i) of this Section have been met), the time and money expended 23at the local and State levels to prepare for and administer the 24assessments, the collective results of the assessments as 25measured against the stated purpose of assessing student 26performance, and other issues involving the assessments   SB2448- 16 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1identified by the Committee. The Committee shall make periodic 2recommendations to the State Superintendent of Education and 3the General Assembly concerning the assessments. 4    (k) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to 5implement this Section.6(Source: P.A. 103-204, eff. 1-1-24.) 7    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.5a)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-20.5a)8    Sec. 10-20.5a. Access to high school campus. 9    (a) In this Section, "public institution of higher 10education" has the meaning given to that term in the Board of 11Higher Education Act.12    (a-3) For school districts maintaining grades 10 through 1312, to provide, on an equal basis, and consistent with the 14federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 15access to a high school campus and student directory 16information to the official recruiting representatives of the 17armed forces of Illinois and the United States, and State 18public institutions of higher education for the purpose of 19informing students of educational and career opportunities if 20the board has provided such access to persons or groups whose 21purpose is to acquaint students with educational or 22occupational opportunities available to them. The board is not 23required to give greater notice regarding the right of access 24to recruiting representatives than is given to other persons 25and groups. In this Section, "directory information" means a   SB2448- 17 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1high school student's name, address, and telephone number.2    (a-5) For a school district maintaining grades 10 through 312, to provide, on an equal basis and consistent with the 4federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 5access to high school student directory information and each 6student's email address and grade point average to the 7Illinois Student Assistance Commission, and each public 8institution of higher education for the purpose of informing 9students of educational and career opportunities. 10    (b) If a student or his or her parent or guardian submits a 11signed, written request to the high school before the end of 12the student's sophomore year (or if the student is a transfer 13student, by another time set by the high school) that 14indicates that the student or his or her parent or guardian 15does not want the student's directory information to be 16provided to official recruiting representatives under 17subsection (a-3) (a) of this Section, the high school may not 18provide access to the student's directory information to these 19recruiting representatives. The high school shall notify its 20students and their parents or guardians of the provisions of 21this subsection (b).22    (b-5) If a student, who is 18 years of age or older or the 23parent or guardian of a student who is under 18 years of age 24submits a signed, written request to the high school before 25the start of the student's junior year, or if the student is a 26transfer student, by another time set by the high school, that   SB2448- 18 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1indicates that the student or his or her parent or guardian 2does permit the student's directory information and the 3student's email address and grade point average to be provided 4under subsection (a-5), the high school shall provide the 5student's directory information and the student's email 6address and grade point average to each public institution of 7higher education, and the Illinois Student Assistance 8Commission. The high school shall notify its students and 9their parents or guardians of the provisions of this 10subsection and, at the time of school registration, give its 11students and their parents or guardians the option for the 12student information to be shared for this purpose. 13    (c) A high school may require official recruiting 14representatives of the armed forces of Illinois and the United 15States to pay a fee for copying and mailing a student's 16directory information in an amount that is not more than the 17actual costs incurred by the high school. 18    (d) Information received by an official recruiting 19representative under this Section may be used only to provide 20information to students concerning educational and career 21opportunities and to assist in designating State Scholars 22under Section 25 of the Higher Education Student Assistance 23Act. Information may not be released to a person who is not 24involved in recruiting students for the armed forces of 25Illinois or the United States or providing educational 26opportunity information for the Board of Higher Education, the   SB2448- 19 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1Illinois Community College Board, the Illinois Student 2Assistance Commission, or public State institutions of higher 3education.4    (e) By July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter, each school 5district under this Section shall make high school January 1, 62024, student directory information shall be made 7electronically accessible through a secure centralized data 8system for official recruiting representatives of the armed 9forces of Illinois and the United States, as well as to the 10Illinois Student Assistance Commission, and State public 11institutions of higher education. 12    The Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Community 13College Board, the Illinois Student Assistance Commission, and 14the State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary to 15administer this Section. 16(Source: P.A. 103-204, eff. 1-1-24.) 17    (105 ILCS 5/34-18)  (from Ch. 122, par. 34-18)18    Sec. 34-18. Powers of the board. The board shall exercise 19general supervision and jurisdiction over the public education 20and the public school system of the city, and, except as 21otherwise provided by this Article, shall have power:22        1. To make suitable provision for the establishment 23    and maintenance throughout the year or for such portion 24    thereof as it may direct, not less than 9 months and in 25    compliance with Section 10-19.05, of schools of all grades   SB2448- 20 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    and kinds, including normal schools, high schools, night 2    schools, schools for defectives and delinquents, parental 3    and truant schools, schools for the blind, the deaf, and 4    persons with physical disabilities, schools or classes in 5    manual training, constructural and vocational teaching, 6    domestic arts, and physical culture, vocation and 7    extension schools and lecture courses, and all other 8    educational courses and facilities, including 9    establishing, equipping, maintaining and operating 10    playgrounds and recreational programs, when such programs 11    are conducted in, adjacent to, or connected with any 12    public school under the general supervision and 13    jurisdiction of the board; provided that the calendar for 14    the school term and any changes must be submitted to and 15    approved by the State Board of Education before the 16    calendar or changes may take effect, and provided that in 17    allocating funds from year to year for the operation of 18    all attendance centers within the district, the board 19    shall ensure that supplemental general State aid or 20    supplemental grant funds are allocated and applied in 21    accordance with Section 18-8, 18-8.05, or 18-8.15. To 22    admit to such schools without charge foreign exchange 23    students who are participants in an organized exchange 24    student program which is authorized by the board. The 25    board shall permit all students to enroll in 26    apprenticeship programs in trade schools operated by the   SB2448- 21 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    board, whether those programs are union-sponsored or not. 2    No student shall be refused admission into or be excluded 3    from any course of instruction offered in the common 4    schools by reason of that student's sex. No student shall 5    be denied equal access to physical education and 6    interscholastic athletic programs supported from school 7    district funds or denied participation in comparable 8    physical education and athletic programs solely by reason 9    of the student's sex. Equal access to programs supported 10    from school district funds and comparable programs will be 11    defined in rules promulgated by the State Board of 12    Education in consultation with the Illinois High School 13    Association. Notwithstanding any other provision of this 14    Article, neither the board of education nor any local 15    school council or other school official shall recommend 16    that children with disabilities be placed into regular 17    education classrooms unless those children with 18    disabilities are provided with supplementary services to 19    assist them so that they benefit from the regular 20    classroom instruction and are included on the teacher's 21    regular education class register;22        2. To furnish lunches to pupils, to make a reasonable 23    charge therefor, and to use school funds for the payment 24    of such expenses as the board may determine are necessary 25    in conducting the school lunch program;26        3. To co-operate with the circuit court;  SB2448- 22 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1        4. To make arrangements with the public or 2    quasi-public libraries and museums for the use of their 3    facilities by teachers and pupils of the public schools;4        5. To employ dentists and prescribe their duties for 5    the purpose of treating the pupils in the schools, but 6    accepting such treatment shall be optional with parents or 7    guardians;8        6. To grant the use of assembly halls and classrooms 9    when not otherwise needed, including light, heat, and 10    attendants, for free public lectures, concerts, and other 11    educational and social interests, free of charge, under 12    such provisions and control as the principal of the 13    affected attendance center may prescribe;14        7. To apportion the pupils to the several schools; 15    provided that no pupil shall be excluded from or 16    segregated in any such school on account of his color, 17    race, sex, or nationality. The board shall take into 18    consideration the prevention of segregation and the 19    elimination of separation of children in public schools 20    because of color, race, sex, or nationality. Except that 21    children may be committed to or attend parental and social 22    adjustment schools established and maintained either for 23    boys or girls only. All records pertaining to the 24    creation, alteration or revision of attendance areas shall 25    be open to the public. Nothing herein shall limit the 26    board's authority to establish multi-area attendance   SB2448- 23 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    centers or other student assignment systems for 2    desegregation purposes or otherwise, and to apportion the 3    pupils to the several schools. Furthermore, beginning in 4    school year 1994-95, pursuant to a board plan adopted by 5    October 1, 1993, the board shall offer, commencing on a 6    phased-in basis, the opportunity for families within the 7    school district to apply for enrollment of their children 8    in any attendance center within the school district which 9    does not have selective admission requirements approved by 10    the board. The appropriate geographical area in which such 11    open enrollment may be exercised shall be determined by 12    the board of education. Such children may be admitted to 13    any such attendance center on a space available basis 14    after all children residing within such attendance 15    center's area have been accommodated. If the number of 16    applicants from outside the attendance area exceed the 17    space available, then successful applicants shall be 18    selected by lottery. The board of education's open 19    enrollment plan must include provisions that allow 20    low-income students to have access to transportation 21    needed to exercise school choice. Open enrollment shall be 22    in compliance with the provisions of the Consent Decree 23    and Desegregation Plan cited in Section 34-1.01;24        8. To approve programs and policies for providing 25    transportation services to students. Nothing herein shall 26    be construed to permit or empower the State Board of   SB2448- 24 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    Education to order, mandate, or require busing or other 2    transportation of pupils for the purpose of achieving 3    racial balance in any school;4        9. Subject to the limitations in this Article, to 5    establish and approve system-wide curriculum objectives 6    and standards, including graduation standards, which 7    reflect the multi-cultural diversity in the city and are 8    consistent with State law, provided that for all purposes 9    of this Article courses or proficiency in American Sign 10    Language shall be deemed to constitute courses or 11    proficiency in a foreign language; and to employ 12    principals and teachers, appointed as provided in this 13    Article, and fix their compensation. The board shall 14    prepare such reports related to minimal competency testing 15    as may be requested by the State Board of Education and, in 16    addition, shall monitor and approve special education and 17    bilingual education programs and policies within the 18    district to ensure that appropriate services are provided 19    in accordance with applicable State and federal laws to 20    children requiring services and education in those areas;21        10. To employ non-teaching personnel or utilize 22    volunteer personnel for: (i) non-teaching duties not 23    requiring instructional judgment or evaluation of pupils, 24    including library duties; and (ii) supervising study 25    halls, long distance teaching reception areas used 26    incident to instructional programs transmitted by   SB2448- 25 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    electronic media such as computers, video, and audio, 2    detention and discipline areas, and school-sponsored 3    extracurricular activities. The board may further utilize 4    volunteer nonlicensed personnel or employ nonlicensed 5    personnel to assist in the instruction of pupils under the 6    immediate supervision of a teacher holding a valid 7    educator license, directly engaged in teaching subject 8    matter or conducting activities; provided that the teacher 9    shall be continuously aware of the nonlicensed persons' 10    activities and shall be able to control or modify them. 11    The general superintendent shall determine qualifications 12    of such personnel and shall prescribe rules for 13    determining the duties and activities to be assigned to 14    such personnel;15        10.5. To utilize volunteer personnel from a regional 16    School Crisis Assistance Team (S.C.A.T.), created as part 17    of the Safe to Learn Program established pursuant to 18    Section 25 of the Illinois Violence Prevention Act of 19    1995, to provide assistance to schools in times of 20    violence or other traumatic incidents within a school 21    community by providing crisis intervention services to 22    lessen the effects of emotional trauma on individuals and 23    the community; the School Crisis Assistance Team Steering 24    Committee shall determine the qualifications for 25    volunteers;26        11. To provide television studio facilities in not to   SB2448- 26 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    exceed one school building and to provide programs for 2    educational purposes, provided, however, that the board 3    shall not construct, acquire, operate, or maintain a 4    television transmitter; to grant the use of its studio 5    facilities to a licensed television station located in the 6    school district; and to maintain and operate not to exceed 7    one school radio transmitting station and provide programs 8    for educational purposes;9        12. To offer, if deemed appropriate, outdoor education 10    courses, including field trips within the State of 11    Illinois, or adjacent states, and to use school 12    educational funds for the expense of the said outdoor 13    educational programs, whether within the school district 14    or not;15        13. During that period of the calendar year not 16    embraced within the regular school term, to provide and 17    conduct courses in subject matters normally embraced in 18    the program of the schools during the regular school term 19    and to give regular school credit for satisfactory 20    completion by the student of such courses as may be 21    approved for credit by the State Board of Education;22        14. To insure against any loss or liability of the 23    board, the former School Board Nominating Commission, 24    Local School Councils, the Chicago Schools Academic 25    Accountability Council, or the former Subdistrict Councils 26    or of any member, officer, agent, or employee thereof,   SB2448- 27 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    resulting from alleged violations of civil rights arising 2    from incidents occurring on or after September 5, 1967 or 3    from the wrongful or negligent act or omission of any such 4    person whether occurring within or without the school 5    premises, provided the officer, agent, or employee was, at 6    the time of the alleged violation of civil rights or 7    wrongful act or omission, acting within the scope of his 8    or her employment or under direction of the board, the 9    former School Board Nominating Commission, the Chicago 10    Schools Academic Accountability Council, Local School 11    Councils, or the former Subdistrict Councils; and to 12    provide for or participate in insurance plans for its 13    officers and employees, including, but not limited to, 14    retirement annuities, medical, surgical and 15    hospitalization benefits in such types and amounts as may 16    be determined by the board; provided, however, that the 17    board shall contract for such insurance only with an 18    insurance company authorized to do business in this State. 19    Such insurance may include provision for employees who 20    rely on treatment by prayer or spiritual means alone for 21    healing, in accordance with the tenets and practice of a 22    recognized religious denomination;23        15. To contract with the corporate authorities of any 24    municipality or the county board of any county, as the 25    case may be, to provide for the regulation of traffic in 26    parking areas of property used for school purposes, in   SB2448- 28 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    such manner as is provided by Section 11-209 of the 2    Illinois Vehicle Code;3        16. In this paragraph:4        "Directory information" means a high school student's 5    name, address, and telephone number.6        "Public institution of higher education" has the 7    meaning given to that term in the Board of Higher 8    Education Act. 9        (a) To provide, on an equal basis and consistent with 10    the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 11    1974, access to a high school campus and student directory 12    information to the official recruiting representatives of 13    the armed forces of Illinois and the United States for the 14    purposes of informing students of the educational and 15    career opportunities available in the military if the 16    board has provided such access to persons or groups whose 17    purpose is to acquaint students with educational or 18    occupational opportunities available to them. The board is 19    not required to give greater notice regarding the right of 20    access to recruiting representatives than is given to 21    other persons and groups. In this paragraph 16, "directory 22    information" means a high school student's name, address, 23    and telephone number.24        (a-5) To provide, on an equal basis and consistent 25    with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 26    of 1974, access to high school student directory   SB2448- 29 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    information and each student's email address and grade 2    point average to each public institution of higher 3    education, the Board of Higher Education, the Illinois 4    Community College Board, and the Illinois Student 5    Assistance Commission for the purpose of informing 6    students of educational and career opportunities. 7        (b) If a student or his or her parent or guardian 8    submits a signed, written request to the high school 9    before the end of the student's sophomore year (or if the 10    student is a transfer student, by another time set by the 11    high school) that indicates that the student or his or her 12    parent or guardian does not want the student's directory 13    information to be provided to official recruiting 14    representatives under subparagraph subsection (a) of 15    paragraph 1 of this Section, the high school may not 16    provide access to the student's directory information to 17    these recruiting representatives. The high school shall 18    notify its students and their parents or guardians of the 19    provisions of this subparagraph subsection (b).20        (b-5) If a student, who is 18 years of age or older, or 21    the parent or guardian of a student under 18 years of age 22    submits a signed, written request to the high school 23    before the start of the student's junior year, or if the 24    student is a transfer student by another time set by the 25    high school, that indicates that the student or his or her 26    parent or guardian does permit the student's directory   SB2448- 30 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    information and the student's email address and grade 2    point average to be provided, the high school shall 3    provide the student's directory information and the 4    student's email address and grade point average to each 5    public institution of higher education, the Board of 6    Higher Education, the Illinois Community College Board, 7    and the Illinois Student Assistance Commission. The high 8    school shall notify its students and their parents or 9    guardians of the provisions of this subparagraph and, at 10    the time of school registration, give its students and 11    their parents or guardians the option for the student 12    information to be shared for this purpose. 13        (c) A high school may require official recruiting 14    representatives of the armed forces of Illinois and the 15    United States to pay a fee for copying and mailing a 16    student's directory information in an amount that is not 17    more than the actual costs incurred by the high school.18        (d) Information received by an official recruiting 19    representative under this Section may be used only to 20    provide information to students concerning educational and 21    career opportunities available in the military and to 22    assist in designating State Scholars under Section 25 of 23    the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. Information 24    may not be released to a person who is not involved in 25    recruiting students for the armed forces of Illinois or 26    the United States or providing educational opportunity   SB2448- 31 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    information for the Board of Higher Education, the 2    Illinois Community College Board, the Illinois Student 3    Assistance Commission, or public institutions of higher 4    education.5        (e) By July 1, 2026 the school district shall make 6    student directory information electronically accessible 7    for official recruiting representatives of the armed 8    forces of Illinois or the United States, as well as to the 9    Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Community College 10    Board, the Illinois Student Assistance Commission, and 11    public institutions of higher education, as set forth in 12    subparagraphs (a) and (a-5) of this paragraph;13        17. (a) To sell or market any computer program 14    developed by an employee of the school district, provided 15    that such employee developed the computer program as a 16    direct result of his or her duties with the school 17    district or through the utilization of school district 18    resources or facilities. The employee who developed the 19    computer program shall be entitled to share in the 20    proceeds of such sale or marketing of the computer 21    program. The distribution of such proceeds between the 22    employee and the school district shall be as agreed upon 23    by the employee and the school district, except that 24    neither the employee nor the school district may receive 25    more than 90% of such proceeds. The negotiation for an 26    employee who is represented by an exclusive bargaining   SB2448- 32 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    representative may be conducted by such bargaining 2    representative at the employee's request.3        (b) For the purpose of this paragraph 17:4        (1) "Computer" means an internally programmed, general 5    purpose digital device capable of automatically accepting 6    data, processing data and supplying the results of the 7    operation.8        (2) "Computer program" means a series of coded 9    instructions or statements in a form acceptable to a 10    computer, which causes the computer to process data in 11    order to achieve a certain result.12        (3) "Proceeds" means profits derived from the 13    marketing or sale of a product after deducting the 14    expenses of developing and marketing such product;15        18. To delegate to the general superintendent of 16    schools, by resolution, the authority to approve contracts 17    and expenditures in amounts of $35,000 or less;18        19. Upon the written request of an employee, to 19    withhold from the compensation of that employee any dues, 20    payments, or contributions payable by such employee to any 21    labor organization as defined in the Illinois Educational 22    Labor Relations Act. Under such arrangement, an amount 23    shall be withheld from each regular payroll period which 24    is equal to the pro rata share of the annual dues plus any 25    payments or contributions, and the board shall transmit 26    such withholdings to the specified labor organization   SB2448- 33 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    within 10 working days from the time of the withholding;2        19a. Upon receipt of notice from the comptroller of a 3    municipality with a population of 500,000 or more, a 4    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more, the Cook 5    County Forest Preserve District, the Chicago Park 6    District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the 7    Chicago Transit Authority, or a housing authority of a 8    municipality with a population of 500,000 or more that a 9    debt is due and owing the municipality, the county, the 10    Cook County Forest Preserve District, the Chicago Park 11    District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the 12    Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing authority by an 13    employee of the Chicago Board of Education, to withhold, 14    from the compensation of that employee, the amount of the 15    debt that is due and owing and pay the amount withheld to 16    the municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest 17    Preserve District, the Chicago Park District, the 18    Metropolitan Water Reclamation District, the Chicago 19    Transit Authority, or the housing authority; provided, 20    however, that the amount deducted from any one salary or 21    wage payment shall not exceed 25% of the net amount of the 22    payment. Before the Board deducts any amount from any 23    salary or wage of an employee under this paragraph, the 24    municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve 25    District, the Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan 26    Water Reclamation District, the Chicago Transit Authority,   SB2448- 34 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    or the housing authority shall certify that (i) the 2    employee has been afforded an opportunity for a hearing to 3    dispute the debt that is due and owing the municipality, 4    the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve District, the 5    Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 6    District, the Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing 7    authority and (ii) the employee has received notice of a 8    wage deduction order and has been afforded an opportunity 9    for a hearing to object to the order. For purposes of this 10    paragraph, "net amount" means that part of the salary or 11    wage payment remaining after the deduction of any amounts 12    required by law to be deducted and "debt due and owing" 13    means (i) a specified sum of money owed to the 14    municipality, the county, the Cook County Forest Preserve 15    District, the Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan 16    Water Reclamation District, the Chicago Transit Authority, 17    or the housing authority for services, work, or goods, 18    after the period granted for payment has expired, or (ii) 19    a specified sum of money owed to the municipality, the 20    county, the Cook County Forest Preserve District, the 21    Chicago Park District, the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 22    District, the Chicago Transit Authority, or the housing 23    authority pursuant to a court order or order of an 24    administrative hearing officer after the exhaustion of, or 25    the failure to exhaust, judicial review;26        20. The board is encouraged to employ a sufficient   SB2448- 35 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    number of licensed school counselors to maintain a 2    student/counselor ratio of 250 to 1. Each counselor shall 3    spend at least 75% of his work time in direct contact with 4    students and shall maintain a record of such time;5        21. To make available to students vocational and 6    career counseling and to establish 5 special career 7    counseling days for students and parents. On these days 8    representatives of local businesses and industries shall 9    be invited to the school campus and shall inform students 10    of career opportunities available to them in the various 11    businesses and industries. Special consideration shall be 12    given to counseling minority students as to career 13    opportunities available to them in various fields. For the 14    purposes of this paragraph, minority student means a 15    person who is any of the following:16        (a) American Indian or Alaska Native (a person having 17    origins in any of the original peoples of North and South 18    America, including Central America, and who maintains 19    tribal affiliation or community attachment).20        (b) Asian (a person having origins in any of the 21    original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, or the 22    Indian subcontinent, including, but not limited to, 23    Cambodia, China, India, Japan, Korea, Malaysia, Pakistan, 24    the Philippine Islands, Thailand, and Vietnam).25        (c) Black or African American (a person having origins 26    in any of the black racial groups of Africa).  SB2448- 36 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1        (d) Hispanic or Latino (a person of Cuban, Mexican, 2    Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or other Spanish 3    culture or origin, regardless of race).4        (e) Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander (a 5    person having origins in any of the original peoples of 6    Hawaii, Guam, Samoa, or other Pacific Islands).7        Counseling days shall not be in lieu of regular school 8    days;9        22. To report to the State Board of Education the 10    annual student dropout rate and number of students who 11    graduate from, transfer from, or otherwise leave bilingual 12    programs;13        23. Except as otherwise provided in the Abused and 14    Neglected Child Reporting Act or other applicable State or 15    federal law, to permit school officials to withhold, from 16    any person, information on the whereabouts of any child 17    removed from school premises when the child has been taken 18    into protective custody as a victim of suspected child 19    abuse. School officials shall direct such person to the 20    Department of Children and Family Services or to the local 21    law enforcement agency, if appropriate;22        24. To develop a policy, based on the current state of 23    existing school facilities, projected enrollment, and 24    efficient utilization of available resources, for capital 25    improvement of schools and school buildings within the 26    district, addressing in that policy both the relative   SB2448- 37 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1    priority for major repairs, renovations, and additions to 2    school facilities and the advisability or necessity of 3    building new school facilities or closing existing schools 4    to meet current or projected demographic patterns within 5    the district;6        25. To make available to the students in every high 7    school attendance center the ability to take all courses 8    necessary to comply with the Board of Higher Education's 9    college entrance criteria effective in 1993;10        26. To encourage mid-career changes into the teaching 11    profession, whereby qualified professionals become 12    licensed teachers, by allowing credit for professional 13    employment in related fields when determining point of 14    entry on the teacher pay scale;15        27. To provide or contract out training programs for 16    administrative personnel and principals with revised or 17    expanded duties pursuant to this Code in order to ensure 18    they have the knowledge and skills to perform their 19    duties;20        28. To establish a fund for the prioritized special 21    needs programs, and to allocate such funds and other lump 22    sum amounts to each attendance center in a manner 23    consistent with the provisions of part 4 of Section 24    34-2.3. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 25    require any additional appropriations of State funds for 26    this purpose;  SB2448- 38 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1        29. (Blank);2        30. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or 3    any other law to the contrary, to contract with third 4    parties for services otherwise performed by employees, 5    including those in a bargaining unit, and to lay off 6    layoff those employees upon 14 days' days written notice 7    to the affected employees. Those contracts may be for a 8    period not to exceed 5 years and may be awarded on a 9    system-wide basis. The board may not operate more than 30 10    contract schools, provided that the board may operate an 11    additional 5 contract turnaround schools pursuant to item 12    (5.5) of subsection (d) of Section 34-8.3 of this Code, 13    and the governing bodies of contract schools are subject 14    to the Freedom of Information Act and Open Meetings Act;15        31. To promulgate rules establishing procedures 16    governing the layoff or reduction in force of employees 17    and the recall of such employees, including, but not 18    limited to, criteria for such layoffs, reductions in force 19    or recall rights of such employees and the weight to be 20    given to any particular criterion. Such criteria shall 21    take into account factors, including, but not limited to, 22    qualifications, certifications, experience, performance 23    ratings or evaluations, and any other factors relating to 24    an employee's job performance;25        32. To develop a policy to prevent nepotism in the 26    hiring of personnel or the selection of contractors;  SB2448- 39 -LRB104 12245 LNS 22352 b1        33. (Blank); and2        34. To establish a Labor Management Council to the 3    board comprised of representatives of the board, the chief 4    executive officer, and those labor organizations that are 5    the exclusive representatives of employees of the board 6    and to promulgate policies and procedures for the 7    operation of the Council.8    The specifications of the powers herein granted are not to 9be construed as exclusive, but the board shall also exercise 10all other powers that may be requisite or proper for the 11maintenance and the development of a public school system, not 12inconsistent with the other provisions of this Article or 13provisions of this Code which apply to all school districts.14    In addition to the powers herein granted and authorized to 15be exercised by the board, it shall be the duty of the board to 16review or to direct independent reviews of special education 17expenditures and services. The board shall file a report of 18such review with the General Assembly on or before May 1, 1990.19(Source: P.A. 102-465, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 20102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; revised 7-17-24.)